New York, session 2025-2026, S2271.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 3-a of section 296 of the executive law is 2 amended by adding a new paragraph (a-1) to read as follows: 3 (a-1) For any employer, licensing agency or employment agency to 4 request or require that a prospective employee disclose their age, date 5 of birth or date of graduation from an educational institution on an 6 initial employment application or during an interview, except in the 7 case of a bona fide occupational qualification or need. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first January next succeeding 9 the date upon which it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, 10 the addition, amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation neces- 11 sary for the implementation of this act on its effective date are 12 authorized to be made and completed on or before such date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00939-01-5